District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-1104.01

General limitations.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 459, Pub. L. 93-376, title IV, § 401
Sept. 23, 1975, D.C. Law 1-16, § 2, 22 DCR 1987
Oct. 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21, § 7(a), 22 DCR 2069
Oct. 30, 1975, D.C. Law 1-27, § 3(a), (b), 22 DCR 2471
Sept. 2, 1976, D.C. Law 1-79, title VIII, § 802, 23 DCR 2050
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-126, title I, § 104, title IV, § 402, 24 DCR 2372
Aug. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-101, § 3, 25 DCR 257
June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1, § 3(e), 25 DCR 9454
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 3(g), (r), (s), 29 DCR 458
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-111, § 2(a), 31 DCR 3952
June 13, 1996, D.C. Law 11-144, § 2, 43 DCR 2174
1981 Ed., § 1-1441.
1973 Ed., § 1-1161.
Applicability of chapter to Law 11-144: Section 4 of D.C. Law 11-144, the Contribution Limitation Initiative Amendment Act of 1996, provided that D.C. Code § 1-1101.01 et seq. shall apply to the act. D.C. Law 11-144 repeals § 1-1104.01 and amends §§ 1-1131.01, 1-1131.03, and 1-1104.02.